Hindi_temp.dix
    <pardef n="xOdZ/a__n">
        <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>anA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>anA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>anA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>anA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>anA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>anA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>anA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>anA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>anA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>anA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>anA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>anA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>anA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>anA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>anA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>anA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>anA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>anA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>anA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>anA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>anA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>anA</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>anA</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>anA</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>anA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>anA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h2"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>anA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>anA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h2"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>anA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>anA</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h2"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>anA</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>anA</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h2"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>anA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>anA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>anA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>anA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>anA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>anA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>anA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>anA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>anA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a_h2"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>anA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a_h2"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>anA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a_h2"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>anA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a_h2"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>anA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a_h2"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>anA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a_h2"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>anA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a_h2"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>anA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a_h2"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/></r></p></e>

    <e lm="xOdZ"><i>xOdZ</i><par n="xOdZ/a__n"/></e>
